Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
ACCD shall develop additional guidance as to which businesses are determined to be critical to public health and safety, as well as economic and national security.

Other businesses may be determined to be critical to public health and safety, as well as economic and national security after requesting an opinion from ACCD. ACCD shall consider:

• whether a business is necessary in order to properly respond to this emergency;

• whether a business transaction or the performance of services requires in-person contact;

• implications for business operations in Vermont, taking into account the economic and societal impacts as well as supply chain dependencies that are geographically distributed; and

• such other factors as the Secretary of ACCD shall determine, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health and the Commissioner of Public Safety.

8.
Essential state and local government functions will also remain open, including offices that provide essential government services.

Except as otherwise set forth herein, this Addendum to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health
and Agency of Human Services, the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated: March 24, 2020

AMENDMENT TO ADDENDUM 6 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Stay Home/Stay Safe: Restart Phase VI]

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and almost two months later Vermont has experienced over 900 cases and over 50 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain
the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, consistent with Centers for Disease Control (CDC) guidelines regarding social distancing, and in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health (VDH), the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in
order to protect individuals at risk for severe illness; and

WHEREAS, after consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor determined it was necessary to require Vermonters to stay home and to limit travel to essential activities only, and suspend the operation of all non-essential
businesses and non-profit governmental services pursuant to Addendum 6 to the Executive Order as of March 24, 2020 (Stay Home/Stay Safe), in order to help reduce the spread of COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy and continues to do so with a limited reopening of retail businesses.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby authorize the Secretary of
the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD) to issue mitigation requirements and procedures for the limited, incremental and phased resumption of business, non-profit and government entity operations which had previously
been determined to be non-critical services under Stay Home/Stay Safe, effective Monday, May 18, 2020. The limited, incremental, and phased resumption of business, non-profit and government entity operations shall begin with
non-essential retail; and mitigation requirements and procedures issued by the Secretary shall require implementation of appropriate occupancy limits and physical distancing, health and sanitation and training measures.

1.
The Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, and with the approval of the Governor, may, from time-to-time, authorize additional limited,
incremental, and phased resumption of business, non-profit and government entity operations and update and modify the mitigation requirements and procedures regarding the resumption of business, non-profit and government entity
operations.

If the Commissioner of the VDH has determined that a COVID-19 outbreak has occurred and businesses and non-profit and government entities cannot safely operate in a way that 1) limits the exposure of customers and staff to COVID-19 and 2) does not threaten
to overwhelm our hospitals and healthcare resources, he is hereby authorized, with approval of the Governor, to notify and require any or all businesses and non-profit and government entities to return to certain standards
of operation.

2.
Businesses and non-profit and government entities deemed critical in accordance with Addendum 6 to the Executive Order and ACCD Sector Guidance (Stay Home/Stay Safe), may continue to operate under pre-existing
guidance and shall operate in accordance with mandatory health and safety and training requirements issued by ACCD.

3.
All businesses and not-for profit and government entities are encouraged to continue business strategies, procedures and practices to maximize use of on-line presence, telephone and web-based service delivery and
phone or online orders for term curb-side pick-up and delivery.

4.
Addendum 2 to the Executive Order dated March 16, 2020, which prohibited on-premises consumption of food or drink, Addendum 4 to the Executive Order dated March 20, 2020, which suspended the operation of close
contact businesses, and Addendum 5 to the Executive Order dated March 23, 2020, which required all businesses, and non-profit and government entities to implement telework procedures to the extent possible, shall remain in
full force and effect.

This Amendment to Addendum 6 to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and, except as amended hereby, Addendum 6 to the Executive Order, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in
consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend Addendum 6, as amended.

Dated May 13, 2020

ADDENDUM 7 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

[Quarantine Restrictions on Travelers Arriving in Vermont]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, aggressive and sustained efforts are necessary to slow the spread of the COVID-19 virus and lessen the strain on Vermont’s healthcare system; and

WHEREAS, the COVID-19 virus continues to spread and threatens to overwhelm the State’s ability to respond; and

WHEREAS, due to extensive community transmission of COVID-19 in our neighboring states of New York, New Jersey and Connecticut, the Centers for Disease Control and prevention (“CDC”), has advised residents of those states to refrain from non-essential
domestic travel for 14 days effective immediately; and

WHEREAS, many Vermonters are returning to Vermont as the weather warms; and

WHEREAS, Vermont recognizes and understands the desire of many of our second-home owners who are residents in regions of the country where COVID-19 is viewed as a greater threat to return to their homes in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 24, 2020, the Governor issued an Executive Order directing all Vermonters to stay at home or in their place of residence, leaving only for essential reasons and further directing all businesses and non-profit entities to cease operations
unless these entities provide services or functions deemed critical to public health and safety (“Stay Home/Stay Safe”); and

WHEREAS, Stay Home/Stay Safe made clear commercial lodging shall be suspended unless required to support COVID-19 response, critical infrastructure and national security; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in light of the significant risk posed by the further spread of this dangerous disease to Vermonters and the viability of our health care system, to direct residents and non-residents alike coming from outside the
State to self-monitor and home-quarantine for a period of 14 days.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order the following:

1.
To preserve the public health and safety, to ensure the healthcare delivery system is capable of serving all, and to help protect those at the highest risk and vulnerability, any person, resident or non-resident,
travelling into Vermont for anything other than an essential purpose, must immediately self-quarantine for 14 days or the balance of 14 days dating from the day of arrival.

2.
“Essential purpose” for purposes of this quarantine restriction shall mean travel required for personal safety; food, beverage or medicine; medical care; care of others; and to perform work, services or functions
deemed critical to public health and safety, as well as economic and national security, as set forth in Stay Home/Stay Safe.

3.
The Agency of Transportation and the Department of Motor Vehicles are hereby directed to post this guidance at all major points of entry into Vermont, on highway message boards and at the Burlington International
Airport and all other Vermont airports.

4.
Guidance for self-quarantine shall be made available by the Vermont Department of Health.

5.
Visitors are instructed not to travel to Vermont if they are displaying symptoms or if they are travelling from cities and regions identified as COVID-19 “hot spots,” including, among others, the states of Florida
and Louisiana and the cities of Detroit, Chicago and New York City. In addition, residents of New York, New Jersey and Connecticut should stay in their home states in strict compliance with CDC travel guidance issued Saturday,
March 28, 2020. This is essential if you will be in close contact with people who are older adults or have a severe chronic health condition.

6.
For the purpose of clarifying Stay Home/Stay Safe as it relates to the suspension of lodging operations, “lodging” shall include, but not be limited to, hotels, motels, bed and breakfasts, inns, short term rentals,
such as those made available through VRBO, Homeaway, AirBnb and other services, parks for recreational vehicles and campgrounds, all public and private camping facilities including those managed by the Vermont Department of
Parks and Recreation. Lodging may be provided for the following purposes:

a.
Housing vulnerable populations (emergency shelter for homeless individuals) as arranged through the state.

b.
Providing accommodations for health care workers, or other workers deemed necessary to support public health, public safety or critical infrastructure.

c.
Use of lodging properties being as quarantine facilities as arranged by the state.

d.
Limited verifiable extenuating circumstances for the care and safety of Vermonters.

On-line reservations shall be suspended and lodging providers shall post a prominent notice on their web platforms which advises potential guests that reservations for lodging in Vermont, as allowed above, shall be accepted by phone only.

Lodging providers may permit existing guests to remain through the end of their scheduled stay, however, may not allow extended stay or new reservations, except for the purposes set forth above.

7.
All state agencies and departments, including the offices of elected officials in the Executive Branch, which register, regulate or otherwise have contact information regarding lodging facilities, shall provide
an electronic advisory regarding the suspension of lodging operations, consistent with this Executive Order.

8.
The Vermont State Police and all county and municipal law enforcement agencies shall monitor the compliance with this Executive Order by lodging providers and notify the Office of the Attorney General regarding
potential non-compliance using a reporting method prescribed by the Department of Public Safety.

9.
The Attorney General shall take such steps as he deems necessary and reasonable to ensure the compliance of lodging providers with this Executive Order.

Except as otherwise set forth herein, this Addendum to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health,
the Agency of Human Services and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated: March 30, 2020

ADDENDUM 8 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

[Non-Congregate Sheltering in Vermont; Extension of Certain Deadlines Relating to Closures of DMV and Bars and Restaurants]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to monitor and plan for the potential for an outbreak
of respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (a disease now known as COVID-19), in the United States; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed Vermont Emergency Management (VEM) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (SEOC), in accordance with the State Emergency Management Plan,
to organize prevention, response, and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID19 in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a State of Emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic, under which FEMA’s Regional Administrators have been delegated authority to approve requests for non-congregate sheltering
for the duration of the Secretary of Health and Human Services’ declaration of a Public Health Emergency for COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts, including the provision of non-congregate sheltering, to save lives, to protect property and public health, and to
ensure public safety in this Public Health Emergency.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order as follows:

1.
Local governments, state agencies and private non-profit organizations statewide shall:

a.
To the extent not already in place, arrange for placement of current clients and vulnerable populations in alternative non-congregate housing solutions for the purpose of providing adequate social distancing as
needed.

b.
To the extent not already in place, implement a temporary quarantine and isolation program utilizing non-congregate solutions including hotels, motels, dormitories, or other forms of non-congregate shelter for
current clients and vulnerable populations for the purpose of providing adequate social distancing between all individuals who are reasonably believed to have been exposed to or infected with COVID-19, or recovering from COVID-19.

c.
Local governments and private non-profit organizations, which determine the need for non-congregate temporary housing to quarantine and temporarily isolate first responders and health care workers who are at reasonable
risk of having been exposed to or are infected with COVID-19, or are recovering from COVID-19, and cannot return to their usual residence because of the risk of infecting other household members, shall provide alternative non-congregate
housing to this population of first responders and health care workers.

This Section 1 shall take effect as of March 1, 2020 and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Agency of Human Services and the Department of
Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

2.
In accordance with the Executive Order, Addendum 2 was issued to suspend on-premises consumption of food or drink at any restaurant, bar, or establishment that offers food or drink. In accordance with the Executive
Order, Directive 3 was issued to direct the Department of Motor Vehicles (DMV) to suspend in-person visits to the DMV district offices. Effective upon signature, this Section 2 shall clarify that both Addendum 2 and Directive
3 are subject to Addendum 6 to the Executive Order (Stay Home, Stay Safe), and both the Addendum and the Directive are hereby extended and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor,
in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Agency of Human Services and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this
Order.

This Addendum shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Agency of Human Services and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management
shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated: April 3, 2020

ADDENDUM 9 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020; Other COVID-19 Related Directives and Clarifications]

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (“CDC”) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to monitor and plan for the potential for an
outbreak of respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”), in the United States; and

WHEREAS, the Governor directed the Vermont Department of Health (“VDH”) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed the Department of Public Safety, Division of Vermont Emergency Management (“DPS/VEM”) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (“SEOC”), in
accordance with the State Emergency Management Plan, to organize prevention, response, and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, President Trump issued a national emergency declaration for the COVID-19 pandemic; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including:

• Directive 1 issued March 15, 2020, to all School Boards and Superintendents for Continuity of Education Planning which closed all schools to in-person education and required planning for education continuity;

• Addendum 1 to the Executive Order issued March 16, 2020, which modified the Executive Order to prohibit all non-essential mass gatherings to the lesser of fifty (50) people or fifty percent (50%) of the occupancy of a facility at the same time for social,
recreational or entertainment activities;

• Addendum 2 to the Executive Order issued March 17, 2020 ordering restaurants, bars, or establishments that offer food or drink to suspend on-premises consumption of food or drink;

• Directive 2 issued March 17, 2020 to all School Boards, Superintendents, and Child Care Programs to close childcare centers and provide for services to children of Essential Persons during the closure period in response to COVID-19;

• Directive 3 issued March 18, 2020 directing Department of Motor Vehicle services to provide online, by mail or phone, and suspend all in-person transactions;

• Directive 4 issued March 19, 2020 to the Department of Liquor and Lottery authorizing take-out, curbside pickup and delivery of beverage alcohol, including spirit-based drinks and malt and vinous product accompanying food orders for off premise consumption;

• Addendum 3 to the Executive Order issued March 20, 2020, requiring the postponement of all non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures;

• Addendum 4 to the Executive Order issued March 21, 2020, which suspended the operation of close-contact businesses and further restricted the size of mass gatherings;

• Addendum 5 to the Executive Order issued March 23, 2020, which ordered all businesses and non-profits to institute work from home procedures to the extent possible;

• Addendum 6 to the Executive Order issued March 24, 2020, which ordered all Vermonters to stay home, stay safe with the exception of those performing critical services (“Stay Home/Stay Safe”);

• Directive 5 issued March 25, 2020 clarifying schools for preK-12 students shall remain dismissed for in-person instruction for the remainder of the 2019-2020 school year and required schools to have continuity of learning plans for remote learning implemented
on or before Monday, April 13, 2020;

• Addendum 7 to the Executive Order issued March 30, 2020, which imposed quarantine restrictions on travelers arriving in Vermont and clarified the closure of lodging operations;

• Addendum 8 to the Executive Order issued April 3, 2020, which clarified the Governor’s direction to provide non-congregate sheltering in Vermont and extended certain deadlines relating to closures of DMV and bars and restaurants; and

WHEREAS, as of April 5, 2020, the United States had experienced 337,646 cases of COVID-19 with 9,648 COVID-19-related deaths; Quebec had experienced 7,944 cases of COVID-19 with 94 COVID-19-related deaths; New York had experienced 122,911 cases of COVID-19
with 4,161 COVID-19-related deaths; Massachusetts had experienced over 12,500 cases of COVID-19 with 231 COVID-19-related deaths; New Hampshire had experienced 621 cases of COVID-19 with 9 COVID-19-related deaths; and Vermont
had experienced 512 cases of COVID-19 with 22 COVID-19-related deaths; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and DPS/VEM, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont through Friday, May 15, 2020; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has further determined to issue a rule which clarifies the scope of the providers and situations protected by

20 V.S.A. § 20
in order to remove barriers to health care facility surge capacity planning; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined to authorize lodging facilities to resume acceptance of reservations for stays and events beginning June 15, 2020, subject to further action as needed to respond to continued COVID-19 response, as well as issue other
directions and clarifications.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby declare the State of Emergency
for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Friday, May 15, 2020.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
The Executive Order and all Directives and Addenda issued thereunder shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department
of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Lodging Reservations.
Addendum 7 to the Executive Order is hereby supplemented to authorize lodging operators to immediately accept reservations for stays and events occurring on or after June 15, 2020;

provided, however,
the Governor, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and the Commissioner of DPS/VEM, shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this date.

3.

Stay Home/Stay Safe Guidance.
For the purpose of clarifying Stay Home/Stay Safe, the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (“ACCD”) is directed to provide guidance as follows:

A.
As it relates to the suspension of real estate activities, clarify existing guidance regarding real estate sales and brokerage to ensure guidance applies to all real estate sales, including those for sale by owner.

On-line real estate sites shall post a prominent notice on their web platforms which advises potential sellers and purchasers that all in-person real estate transactions are temporarily suspended.

Real estate functions that can be conducted online, by phone or email may continue.

B.
As it relates to Financial, Legal and Professional Services and Municipalities, clarify existing guidelines to the extent necessary to facilitate assistance to Vermonters seeking to take advantage of state and
federal financial support made available in response to the economic impacts of COVID-19.

4.

Motor Vehicle Inspections.
In order to alleviate in-person contact at locations offering vehicle inspections,the Department of Motor Vehicles is hereby directed to extend inspections for motor vehicles other than school buses and motor
buses, for 60 days for inspections due in April 2020 (a green “4”).

5.

Directive to State Agencies Regarding Non-Congregate Temporary Housing.
Effective as of March 1, 2020, State Agencies which determine the need for non-congregate temporary housing to quarantine and temporarily isolate first responders, including Department of Corrections personnel,
health care workers and others critical to the COVID-19 response, such as critical infrastructure construction and maintenance, who are at reasonable risk of having been exposed to or are infected with COVID-19, or are recovering
from COVID-19, and cannot return to their usual residence because of the risk of infecting other household members, shall provide alternative non-congregate housing to this population of first responders, health care workers
and others critical to the COVID-19 response.

6.

COVID-19 Emergency Response Services.
In accordance with the authority granted to the Governor pursuant to 20 V.S.A. §§ 8 and 9 to make, amend, and rescind necessary orders, rules, and regulations for emergency management purposes, I hereby adopt
the following rule for the purpose of interpreting the scope of 20 V.S.A. § 20 relating to legal immunity for Health Care Facilities, Health Care Providers, and Health Care Volunteers, as defined herein, who are providing COVID-19
related emergency management services or response activities. The intent of this rule is to clarify that under protections afforded by

20 V.S.A. § 20
, Health Care Facilities, Health Care Providers, and Health Care Volunteers would be immune from civil liability for any death, injury, or loss resulting from COVID-19 related emergency management services or
response activities, except in the case of willful misconduct or gross negligence.

A.
For purposes of this Addendum 9 to the Executive Order, the following terms are defined as set forth below; provided, however, these definitions are intended to provide further detail to the scope of the immunities
provided in 20 V.S.A. § 20 and are not intended to limit or narrow the scope of the immunities provided therein:

i.
“All-hazards” for purposes of the existing State of Emergency means the COVID-19 outbreak in Vermont which has been determined by the Governor to pose a threat or may pose a threat to public safety in Vermont.

ii.
“Emergency functions” include, for purposes of this order, services provided by the public safety, firefighting services, police services, sheriff’s department services, medical and health services, including those
services provided by Health Care Providers and Health Care Volunteers, rescue, communications, evacuation of persons, emergency welfare services, protection of critical infrastructure, emergency transportation, other functions
related to civilian protection, and all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for and carrying out of these functions.

iii.
“Emergency management” means the preparation for and implementation of all emergency functions, other than the functions for which military forces or other federal agencies are primarily responsible, to prevent,
plan for, mitigate, and support response and recovery efforts from all hazards. Emergency management includes the equipping, exercising, and training designed to ensure that this state and its communities are prepared to deal
with all-hazards.

iv.
“Health Care Facilities” means State licensed nursing homes (as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 7102(7)
) and Middlesex Therapeutic Community Residence, all State licensed assisted living residences (as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 7102(1)
), Level III residential care homes (33 V.S.A. 7102(10)(A)), intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/ID) (42 C.F.R. § 440.150), all State therapeutic community residences
(as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 7102(11)
), Level IV residential care homes (

33 V.S.A. § 7102(10)(B)
), all hospitals (as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 1902
) and all alternate or temporary hospital sites and other isolation, quarantine or housing sites designated by the Commissioner of PSD/VEM for the treatment of, or alternate shelter for those who have been exposed
to or infected with COVID-19.

v.
“Health Care Providers” means all health care providers as defined by

18 V.S.A. § 9432(9)
, including volunteers, who are providing health care services in response to the COVID-19 outbreak and are authorized to do so.

vi.
“Health Care Volunteers” means all volunteers or medical or nursing students who do not have licensure who are providing services, assistance, or support at a Health Care Facility in response to the COVID-19 outbreak
and are authorized to do so.

B.
For Health Care Facilities and Health Care Providers, an emergency management service or response activity, includes, but may not be limited to:

i.
Expedited postponement of non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures, including dental procedures, in the safest but most expedient way possible, as ordered by Addendum 3 of the Executive
Order, if elective surgeries and medical and surgical procedures are performed at the Health Care Facility or by the Health Care Provider;

ii.
Cancelling or denying elective surgeries or procedures or routine care to the extent determined necessary for the health, safety and welfare of a patient or as necessary to respond to the COVID-19 outbreak;

iii.
Redeployment or cross training of staff not typically assigned to such duties, to the extent necessary to respond to the COVID-19 outbreak;

iv.
Planning, or enacting, crisis standard-of-care measures, including, but not limited to, modifying numbers of beds, preserving PPE, and triaging access to services or equipment as necessary to respond to the COVID-19
outbreak; and

v.
Reduced record-keeping to the extent necessary for Health Care Providers to respond to the COVID-19 outbreak.

C.
For Health Care Volunteers, “emergency management services or response activities” also includes providing services, assistance, or support at a Health Care Facility in response to the COVID-19 outbreak.

D.
Nothing contained in this Executive Order shall alter existing law with respect to gross negligence or willful misconduct.

This Addendum 9 shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of
Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated April 10, 2020

ADDENDUM 10 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

Work Smart & Stay Safe -Restart VT: Phase I

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and a little more than a month later Vermont has experienced over 760 cases and 30 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
Addenda to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the school year, suspending the operation of close
contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe with exceptions for essential purposes on transactions, and suspending the operation of businesses which are not
deemed critical; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, as we move forward, businesses, governments and employees must understand that how they work is essential to resuming and maintaining business operations, to stay safe and save lives.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby order as follows:

1.

Health and Safety Requirements.
The State shall undertake a phased approach to reopen the economy, balancing the need to restore and strengthen our overall social and economic wellbeing with the prevention of a resurgence of COVID-19 that
would undermine or lose the important public health outcomes achieved to date. In order to achieve this balance, all businesses and non-profit and governmental entities, including employees and contractors of governmental entities,
which are operating or will be operating during the declared State of Emergency, shall implement the following physical distancing, health and sanitation measures in accordance with Vermont Department of Health and CDC guidelines:

a.
Employees shall not report to, or be allowed to remain at, work or job site if sick or symptomatic (with fever, cough, and/or shortness of breath).

b.
Employees must observe strict social distancing of 6 feet while on the job.

c.
Employees must wear non-medical cloth face coverings (bandanna, scarf, or non-medical mask, etc.) over their nose and mouth when in the presence of others. In the case of retail cashiers, a translucent shield or
“sneeze guard” is acceptable in lieu of a mask.

d.
Employees must have easy and frequent access to soap and water or hand sanitizer during duration of work, and handwashing or hand sanitization should be required before entering, and leaving, job sites. All common
spaces and equipment, including bathrooms, frequently touched surfaces and doors, tools and equipment, and vehicles must be cleaned and disinfected at the beginning, middle and end of each shift and prior to transfer from one
person to another.

e.
No more than 2 people shall occupy one vehicle when conducting work.

2.

Customer and General Public Mask Use.
Customers and the public in general, are encouraged to wear cloth face coverings any time they are interacting with others from outside their households.

3.

Phased Restart.
Preventing outbreaks and limiting the spread of COVID-19 is the only way to avoid future business and social disruption. The success of this phased restart will depend in large part on the ability of employers
and employees to adhere to the public health, safety, and social distancing measures essential to limiting the spread of illness.

To safely reopen certain business, non-profit and governmental operations not determined to be critical pursuant to the Governor’s Stay Home/Stay Safe order, ACCD shall, in consultation with VDH and the Department of Public Safety/Vermont Emergency Management,
support the development of plans and sector strategies to allow for phased, data-driven reopening.

Subject to compliance by all affected businesses and non-profit and government entities with the health and safety requirements above, Phase 1 of this effort, effective April 20, 2020, will allow the following:

a.